Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 8.2 Traffic Tribunal
8-8.2-12.
Additional benefits payable to retired judges and their surviving spouses or domestic partners.

All judges of the administrative adjudication court and all judges of the administrative adjudication court who have been reassigned to the traffic tribunal, or their surviving spouses or domestic partners, who retire after January 1, 1970 and who receive a retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall, on the first day of January, next following the third anniversary of the retirement, receive a cost of living retirement adjustment in addition to his or her retirement allowance in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original allowance, compounded annually from the year cost of living adjustment was first payable to be continued during the lifetime of the judge or his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner. For the purpose of such computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance.

Any judge who retired prior to January 31, 1980, shall be deemed for the purpose of this section to have retired on January 1, 1980.

For judges not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost of living adjustment described in subsection (a) above shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For judges eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (c) shall not apply.

This subsection (d) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.

(d) (1)

Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to paragraph (d)(2) below, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31, 1989 as a non-contributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989 as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser of the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under (d)(1)(A) above. The “Five-Year Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment return of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to paragraph (d)(2) below, the benefit adjustment provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

(2)

Except as provided in paragraph (d)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust, and the State Police Retirements Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which even the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this paragraph (d)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

(3)

Notwithstanding paragraph (d)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five (5) plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph (d)(1) above until the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust, and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

(4)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph (d) of §

8-8.2-12

shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or prior to June 30, 2012.

This subsection (e) shall become effective July 1, 2015.

(A) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this subsection (e)(1)(A), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to justices and/or beneficiaries of justices who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%) of the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the justice’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.

(B)

Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31,1989 as a non-contributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989 as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (e)(2) below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):

Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.

In no event shall the sum of (i) plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).

(II)

Is equal to the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (e)(1)(B)(I) above.

The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (e)(1)(B) shall be provided to all retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect, and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later.

(2)

Except as provided in subsection (e)(3), the benefit adjustments under subsection (e)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (e)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

(3)

Notwithstanding subsection (e)(2), effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2015, in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection (e)(1)(B) above; and (ii) The dollar amount in subsection (e)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Effective for members and or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60) days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of this §

8-8.2-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 16, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 18; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 18; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 23.

8-8.2-13.
Calculation of retirement benefits.

For the purposes of the calculation of retirement benefits, in the event that any judge of the administrative adjudication court or any judge of the administrative adjudication court who has been reassigned to the traffic tribunal by this chapter participates or acquiesces in a state shutdown or in a reduced salary or salary deferral plan consistent with any plan imposed upon or agreed to by other state employees, his or her annual salary shall be calculated as if she or he had not participated or acquiesced in any shutdown or plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1.

8-8.2-14.
Transfer of records and other property.

All books, papers, records, current appropriations and relevant property necessary for the functioning of the traffic tribunal shall be transferred thereto from the administrative adjudication court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1.

8-8.2-15.
Transfer of employees.

All employees of the administrative adjudication court deemed by the chief judge of the district court, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, and subject to the labor laws of this state and any applicable collective bargaining agreement, to be essential to the operation of the traffic tribunal are hereby transferred to the said traffic tribunal. The chief judge of the district court shall, subject to the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, and subject to any applicable collective bargaining agreement, assign appropriate titles and duties to said employees and shall promulgate a listing of said titles and duties within six (6) months from July 1, 1999.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 13.

8-8.2-16.
Interpretation.

Whenever, in the general laws, the words administrative adjudication court shall appear, said words shall be construed and interpreted as, and to mean, the traffic tribunal. Whenever, in the general laws, the words administrator/clerk of the administrative adjudication court shall appear, said words shall be interpreted and construed as, and to mean, clerk of the traffic tribunal. Except as provided in §§

8-8.2-6

,

8-8.2-7

,

8-8.2-8

,

8-8.2-9

,

8-8.2-11

, and

8-8.2-12

, whenever, in the general laws, the words judge of the administrative adjudication court shall appear, said words shall be construed and interpreted as, and to mean, judge or magistrate of the traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1.

8-8.2-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 8, effective August 1, 2007.

8-8.2-18.
Custody of records.

The traffic tribunal established by this chapter shall have custody of all records, books, and papers of the administrative adjudication court heretofore existing. All proceedings and processes pending in the administrative adjudication court heretofore existing and shall continue with the same force and effect in the traffic tribunal herein established; and all rights and liabilities of the parties to such actions and proceedings and processes commenced prior to July 1, 1999, including costs of appeal, shall continue in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1.

8-8.2-19.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof shall for any reason be judged invalid, such a judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of the law, but shall be confined in its effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 4, § 1.

8-8.2-20.
Domestic partner — Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 4.

8-8.2-21.
Abstracts of court records — Traffic tribunal.

A full record shall be kept by the Rhode Island traffic tribunal in this state of every case in which a person is charged with violating subparagraphs

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

and

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

. An abstract of the record shall be retained by the court. The abstract shall be made upon forms prepared by the chief magistrate of the Rhode Island traffic tribunal and shall include all necessary information as to the parties to the cause, the nature of the offense, the date of the hearing, the plea, the decision, the judgment, and the result, and every abstract shall be certified by the clerk of the court. The Rhode Island traffic tribunal shall keep the records and they shall not be open to public inspection. The chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal shall make the records available to Rhode Island state and local police departments for their inspection of the details of cases which have been heard before the tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 5.